Utah statutes.
76-6-506.3.   Financial transaction card offenses -- Unlawful acquisition,
possession, or transfer of card.
Any person is guilty of a third degree felony who:
(1)  acquires a financial transaction card from another without the consent of
the card holder or the issuer;
(2)  receives a financial transaction card with intent to use it in violation
of Section 76-6-506.2;
(3)  sells or transfers a financial transaction card to another person with
the knowledge that it will be used in violation of Section 76-6-506.2;
(4) (a)  acquires a financial transaction card that the person knows was lost,
mislaid, or delivered under a mistake as to the identity or address of the
card holder; and
(b) (i)  retains possession with intent to use it in violation of Section
76-6-506.2; or
(ii)  sells or transfers a financial transaction card to another person with
the knowledge that it will be used in violation of Section 76-6-506.2; or
(5)  possesses, sells, or transfers any information necessary for the use of a
financial transaction card, including the credit number of the card, the
expiration date of the card, or the personal identification code related to
the card:
(a) (i)  without the consent of the card holder or the issuer; or
(ii)  with the knowledge that the information has been acquired without
consent of the card holder or the issuer; and
(b)  with intent to use the information in violation of Section 76-6-506.2.
